Massachusetts, session 194th, H1200.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 193B of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following:- No insurance provider
shall charge a fee for processing an electronic transaction without written notification.
of 1